Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 1. Public School Facilities in General.
Sec. 14.11.100.
State aid for costs of school construction debt.

During each fiscal year, the state shall allocate to a municipality that is a school district the following sums:

payments made by the municipality during the fiscal year two years earlier for the retirement of principal and interest on outstanding bonds, notes, or other indebtedness incurred before July 1, 1977, to pay costs of school construction;

90 percent of

payments made by the municipality during the fiscal year two years earlier for the retirement of principal and interest on outstanding bonds, notes, or other indebtedness incurred after June 30, 1977, and before July 1, 1978, to pay costs of school construction;

cash payments made after June 30, 1976, and before July 1, 1978, by the municipality during the fiscal year two years earlier to pay costs of school construction;

90 percent of

payments made by the municipality during the fiscal year two years earlier for the retirement of principal and interest on outstanding bonds, notes, or other indebtedness incurred after June 30, 1978, and before January 1, 1982, to pay costs of school construction projects approved under AS

14.07.020(a)(11)

;

cash payments made after June 30, 1978, and before July 1, 1982, by the municipality during the fiscal year two years earlier to pay costs of school construction projects approved under AS

14.07.020(a)(11)

;

subject to (h) and (i) of this section, up to 90 percent of

payments made by the municipality during the current fiscal year for the retirement of principal and interest on outstanding bonds, notes, or other indebtedness incurred after December 31, 1981, and authorized by the qualified voters of the municipality before July 1, 1983, to pay costs of school construction, additions to schools, and major rehabilitation projects that exceed $25,000 and are approved under AS 14.07.020(a)(11);

cash payments made after June 30, 1982, and before July 1, 1983, by the municipality during the fiscal year two years earlier to pay costs of school construction, additions to schools, and major rehabilitation projects that exceed $25,000 and are approved under AS 14.07.020(a)(11); and

payments made by the municipality during the current fiscal year for the retirement of principal and interest on outstanding bonds, notes, or other indebtedness to pay costs of school construction, additions to schools, and major rehabilitation projects that exceed $25,000 and are submitted to the department for approval under AS 14.07.020(a)(11) before July 1, 1983, and approved by the qualified voters of the municipality before October 15, 1983, not to exceed a total project cost of (i) $6,600,000 if the annual growth rate of average daily membership of the municipality is more than seven percent but less than 12 percent, or (ii) $20,000,000 if the annual growth rate of average daily membership of the municipality is 12 percent or more; payments made by a municipality under this subparagraph on total project costs that exceed the amounts set out in (i) and (ii) of this subparagraph are subject to (5)(A) of this subsection;

subject to (h) — (j) of this section, 80 percent of

payments made by the municipality during the fiscal year for the retirement of principal and interest on outstanding bonds, notes, or other indebtedness authorized by the qualified voters of the municipality

after June 30, 1983, but before March 31, 1990, to pay costs of school construction, additions to schools, and major rehabilitation projects that exceed $25,000 and are approved under AS 14.07.020(a)(11); or

before July 1, 1989, and reauthorized before November 1, 1989, to pay costs of school construction, additions to schools, and major rehabilitation projects that exceed $25,000 and are approved under AS 14.07.020(a)(11); and

cash payments made after June 30, 1983, by the municipality during the fiscal year two years earlier to pay costs of school construction, additions to schools, and major rehabilitation projects that exceed $25,000 and are approved by the department before July 1, 1990, under AS 14.07.020(a)(11);

subject to (h) — (j) and (m) of this section, 70 percent of payments made by the municipality during the fiscal year for the retirement of principal and interest on outstanding bonds, notes, or other indebtedness authorized by the qualified voters of the municipality on or after April 30, 1993, but before July 1, 1996, to pay costs of school construction, additions to schools, and major rehabilitation projects that exceed $200,000 and are approved under AS 14.07.020(a)(11);

subject to (h) — (j) and (m) of this section, 70 percent of payments made by the municipality during the fiscal year for the retirement of principal and interest on outstanding bonds, notes, or other indebtedness authorized by the qualified voters of the municipality after March 31, 1990, but before April 30, 1993, to pay costs of school construction, additions to schools, and major rehabilitation projects;

subject to (h), (i), (j)(2) — (5), and (n) of this section and after projects funded by the bonds, notes, or other indebtedness have been approved by the commissioner, 70 percent of payments made by the municipality during the fiscal year for the retirement of principal and interest on outstanding bonds, notes, or other indebtedness authorized by the qualified voters of the municipality on or after July 1, 1995, but before July 1, 1998, to pay costs of school construction, additions to schools, and major rehabilitation projects that exceed $200,000 and are approved under AS 14.07.020(a)(11);

subject to (h), (i), (j)(2) — (5), and (n) of this section and after projects funded by the bonds, notes, or other indebtedness have been approved by the commissioner, 70 percent of payments made by the municipality during the fiscal year for the retirement of principal and interest on outstanding bonds, notes, or other indebtedness authorized by the qualified voters of the municipality on or after July 1, 1998, but before July 1, 2006, to pay costs of school construction, additions to schools, and major rehabilitation projects that exceed $200,000 and are approved under AS 14.07.020(a)(11);

subject to (h), (i), (j)(2) — (5), and (o) of this section, and after projects funded by the bonds, notes, or other indebtedness have been approved by the commissioner, 70 percent of payments made by the municipality during the fiscal year for the retirement of principal and interest on outstanding bonds, notes, or other indebtedness authorized by the qualified voters of the municipality on or after June 30, 1998, to pay costs of school construction, additions to schools, and major rehabilitation projects that exceed $200,000, are approved under AS 14.07.020(a)(11), and are not reimbursed under (n) of this section;

subject to (h), (i), and (j)(2) — (5) of this section, and after projects funded by the bonds, notes, or other indebtedness have been approved by the commissioner, 70 percent of payments made by a municipality during the fiscal year for the retirement of principal and interest on outstanding bonds, notes, or other indebtedness authorized by the qualified voters of the municipality on or after June 30, 1999, but before January 1, 2005, to pay costs of school construction, additions to schools, and major rehabilitation projects and education-related facilities that exceed $200,000, are approved under AS 14.07.020(a)(11), and are not reimbursed under (n) or (o) of this section;

subject to (h), (i), and (j)(2), (3), and (5) of this section, 60 percent of payments made by a municipality during the fiscal year for the retirement of principal and interest on outstanding bonds, notes, or other indebtedness authorized by the qualified voters of the municipality on or after June 30, 1999, but before January 1, 2005, to pay costs of school construction, additions to schools, and major rehabilitation projects and education-related facilities that exceed $200,000, are reviewed under AS 14.07.020(a)(11), and are not reimbursed under (n) or (o) of this section;

subject to (h), (i), (j)(2) — (5), and (p) of this section, and after projects funded by the tax exempt bonds, notes, or other indebtedness have been approved by the commissioner, 70 percent of payments made by a municipality during the fiscal year for the retirement of principal and interest on outstanding tax exempt bonds, notes, or other indebtedness authorized by the qualified voters of the municipality on or after June 30, 1999, but before October 31, 2006, to pay costs of school construction, additions to schools, and major rehabilitation projects and education-related facilities that exceed $200,000, are approved under AS 14.07.020(a)(11), and are not reimbursed under (n) or (o) of this section;

subject to (h), (i), (j)(2), (3), and (5), and (p) of this section, 60 percent of payments made by a municipality during the fiscal year for the retirement of principal and interest on outstanding tax exempt bonds, notes, or other indebtedness authorized by the qualified voters of the municipality on or after June 30, 1999, but before October 31, 2006, to pay costs of school construction, additions to schools, and major rehabilitation projects and education-related facilities that exceed $200,000, are reviewed under AS 14.07.020(a)(11), and are not reimbursed under (n) or (o) of this section;

subject to (h), (i), (j)(2) — (5), and (q) of this section, and after projects funded by the bonds, notes, or other indebtedness have been approved by the commissioner, 90 percent of payments made by a municipality during the fiscal year for the retirement of principal and interest on outstanding bonds, notes, or other indebtedness authorized by the qualified voters of the municipality on or after June 30, 1999, but before October 31, 2006, to pay costs of school construction, additions to schools, and major rehabilitation projects and education-related facilities that exceed $200,000, are approved under AS 14.07.020(a)(11), meet the 10 percent participating share requirement for a municipal school district under the former participating share amounts required under AS

14.11.008(b)

, and are not reimbursed under (n) or (o) of this section;

subject to (h), (i), and (j)(2) — (5) of this section, and after projects funded by the tax exempt bonds, notes, or other indebtedness have been approved by the commissioner, 70 percent of payments made by a municipality during the fiscal year for the retirement of principal and interest on outstanding tax exempt bonds, notes, or other indebtedness authorized by the qualified voters of the municipality on or after October 1, 2006, but before January 1, 2015, to pay costs of school construction, additions to schools, and major rehabilitation projects and education- related facilities that exceed $200,000, are approved under AS 14.07.020(a)(11), and are not reimbursed under (o) of this section;

subject to (h), (i), and (j)(2), (3), and (5) of this section, 60 percent of payments made by a municipality during the fiscal year for the retirement of principal and interest on outstanding tax exempt bonds, notes, or other indebtedness authorized by the qualified voters of the municipality on or after October 1, 2006, but before January 1, 2015, to pay costs of school construction, additions to schools, and major rehabilitation projects and education-related facilities that exceed $200,000, are reviewed under AS 14.07.020(a)(11), and are not reimbursed under (o) of this section;

subject to (h), (i), and (j)(2) — (5) of this section, and after projects funded by the tax exempt bonds, notes, or other indebtedness have been approved by the commissioner, 50 percent of payments made by a municipality during the fiscal year for the retirement of principal of and interest on outstanding tax exempt bonds, notes, or other indebtedness authorized by the qualified voters of the municipality on or after July 1, 2025, to pay costs of school construction, additions to schools, and major rehabilitation projects and education-related facilities that exceed $200,000, are approved under AS 14.07.020(a)(11), and are not reimbursed under (o) of this section;

subject to (h), (i), and (j)(2), (3), and (5) of this section, 40 percent of payments made by a municipality during the fiscal year for the retirement of principal of and interest on outstanding tax exempt bonds, notes, or other indebtedness authorized by the qualified voters of the municipality on or after July 1, 2025, to pay costs of school construction, additions to schools, and major rehabilitation projects and education-related facilities that exceed $200,000, are reviewed under AS 14.07.020(a)(11), and are not reimbursed under (o) of this section.

The commissioner shall administer the program of reimbursement authorized under this section and shall provide by regulation for the filing of applications for reimbursement, the form of proof of costs for which application for reimbursement is made, and other regulations necessary to administer the program. An amount due a municipality for reimbursement under this section may not be reduced by the cost to the department to administer the reimbursement program. The commissioner shall exclude from the total school construction cost of the local district all state and federal funds included in these costs except funds provided under this section and AS

43.50.140

.

The school construction account is established. Funds to carry out the provisions of this section shall be included within the appropriation bill authorizing capital expenditures submitted to the legislature under AS 37.07.020(a)(3) and may be appropriated annually by the legislature to the account. If amounts in the account are insufficient for the purpose of providing the share to which a borough or city is entitled under this section, those funds that are available shall be distributed pro rata among the eligible municipalities, except that the legislature may direct that additional debt service on refunding bonds that exceeds the total debt service on the refunded bonds be disregarded in whole or in part.

Money in the school construction account that at the end of the fiscal year for which the money is appropriated, exceeds the amount required for the allocations authorized in this section reverts to the general fund.

The commissioner shall annually prepare a report on allocations of state aid made under this section, including the amount of state aid paid on a per capita and per student basis and the resultant effect on the rate of levy of taxes by the municipality for educational purposes. The commissioner shall notify the legislature that the report is available.

[Repealed, § 17 ch 147 SLA 1978.]

[Repealed, § 47 ch 6 SLA 1984.]

An allocation under (a)(4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), or (10) of this section for school construction begun after July 1, 1982, shall be reduced by the amount of money used for the construction of residential space, hockey rinks, planetariums, saunas, and other facilities for single purpose sporting or recreational uses that are not suitable for other activities and by the money used for construction that exceeds the amount needed for construction of a facility of efficient design as determined by the department. An allocation under (a)(4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), or (10) of this section may not be reduced by the amount of money used for construction of a small swimming pool, tank, or water storage facility used for water sports. However, an allocation shall be reduced by the difference between the amount of money used to construct a swimming pool that exceeds the standards adopted by the department and the amount of money that would have been used to construct a small swimming pool, tank, or water storage facility, as determined by the commissioner.

For the purposes of (a)(4) — (10) of this section,

an indebtedness for bonds is incurred after the bonds are sold;

reimbursement for a cash payment may only be made after the payment is made to a vendor; and

payments may not be made for costs that are incurred under a contract after the contract has been released.

Except as provided in (l) of this section, the state may not allocate money to a municipality for a school construction project under (a)(5), (6), or (7) of this section unless the municipality complies with the requirements of (1) — (5) of this subsection, the project is approved by the commissioner before the local vote on the bond issue for the project or for bonds authorized after March 31, 1990, but on or before April 30, 1993, the bonds are approved by the commissioner before reimbursement by the state, and the local vote occurs before July 1, 1987, or after June 30, 1988. In approving a project under this subsection, and to the extent required under (a)(8) — (17) of this section, the commissioner shall require

the municipality to include on the ballot for the bond issue, for bonds authorized on or before March 31, 1990, or after April 30, 1993, the estimated total cost of each project including estimated total interest, estimated annual operation and maintenance costs, the estimated amounts that will be paid by the state and by the municipality, and the approximate amount that would be due in annual taxes on $100,000 in assessed value to retire the debt;

that the bonds may not be refunded unless the annual debt service on the refunding issue is not greater than the annual debt service on the original issue;

that the bonds must be repaid in approximately equal annual principal payments or approximately equal debt service payments over a period of at least 10 years;

the municipality to demonstrate need for the project by establishing that the school district has

projected long-term student enrollment that indicates the district has inadequate facilities to meet present or projected enrollment;

facilities that require repair or replacement in order to meet health and safety laws or regulations or building codes;

demonstrated that the project will result in a reduction in annual operating costs that economically justifies the cost of the project; or

facilities that require modification or rehabilitation for the purpose of improving the instructional program;

evidence acceptable to the department that the district

has a preventive maintenance plan that

includes a computerized maintenance management program, cardex system, or other formal systematic means of tracking the timing and costs associated with planned and completed maintenance activities, including scheduled preventive maintenance;

addresses energy management for buildings owned or operated by the district;

includes a regular custodial care program for buildings owned or operated by the district;

includes preventive maintenance training for facility managers and maintenance employees; and

includes renewal and replacement schedules for electrical, mechanical, structural, and other components of facilities owned or operated by the district; and

is adequately following the preventive maintenance plan.

[Repealed, § 7 ch 115 SLA 2002.]

Bonds may be refunded without compliance with (j)(2) and (3) of this section if the refunding bonds are issued after June 30, 1987, and before January 1, 1989, and the time remaining for repayment on the original bonds is more than five years. The repayment term on refunding bonds may not exceed 20 years. For the purposes of determining the level of reimbursement, refunding bonds are considered to be issued as of the date of the first issue of bonds, notes, or other indebtedness or of the bonds that refund the bonds, whichever is later.

The total amount of school construction projects approved for reimbursement by the department under (a)(6) or (7) of this section

may not exceed $250,000,000; and

until July 1, 1996, shall be allocated as follows:

$133,000,000 shall be allocated to projects in a municipality with a population of 200,000 or more people;

$67,000,000 shall be allocated to projects in a municipality with a population of at least 60,000, but less than 200,000 people;

$50,000,000 shall be allocated to projects in a municipality with less than 60,000 people.

The total amount of school construction projects approved for reimbursement by the department under (a)(8) or (9) of this section

may not exceed $357,143,000; and

after June 30, 1995, and until July 1, 2006, shall be allocated as follows:

$154,286,000 shall be allocated to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of 25,000 or more students in fiscal year 1998, as determined under former AS

14.17.160

;

$57,143,000 shall be allocated to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of at least 15,000 but less than 25,000 students in fiscal year 1998, as determined under former AS

14.17.160

;

$145,714,000 shall be allocated to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of less than 15,000 students in fiscal year 1998, as determined under former AS 14.17.160; allocations under this subparagraph

shall first be made to projects described under (a)(8) of this section and then made to projects described under (a)(9) of this section; and

may not exceed $16,000,000 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of less than 4,000 students in fiscal year 1998, as determined under former AS 14.17.160.

The total amount of school construction projects approved for reimbursement by the department under (a)(10) of this section

may not exceed $190,644,901; and

after June 30, 1998, and until July 1, 2006, shall be allocated as follows:

$77,897,000 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of 25,000 or more students in fiscal year 2000, as determined under AS

14.17.500

;

$14,571,000 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of at least 15,000 but less than 25,000 students in fiscal year 2000, as determined under AS

14.17.500

;

$14,143,000 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of at least 10,000 but less than 15,000 students in fiscal year 2000, as determined under AS 14.17.500;

$7,429,000 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of at least 7,500 but less than 10,000 students in fiscal year 2000, as determined under AS 14.17.500;

$20,712,912 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of at least 5,000 but less than 7,500 students in fiscal year 2000, as determined under AS 14.17.500;

$2,660,000 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of at least 2,750 but less than 3,000 students in fiscal year 2000, as determined under AS 14.17.500;

$454,000 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of at least 2,400 but less than 2,750 students in fiscal year 2000, as determined under AS 14.17.500;

$46,869,989 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of at least 2,050 but less than 2,400 students in fiscal year 2000, as determined under AS 14.17.500;

$329,000 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of at least 1,700 but less than 1,750 students in fiscal year 2000, as determined under AS 14.17.500;

$286,000 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of at least 650 but less than 725 students in fiscal year 2000, as determined under AS 14.17.500;

$519,000 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of at least 500 but less than 525 students in fiscal year 2000, as determined under AS 14.17.500;

$2,224,000 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of at least 425 but less than 482 students in fiscal year 2000, as determined under AS 14.17.500;

$2,550,000 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of at least 290 but less than 305 students in fiscal year 2000, as determined under AS 14.17.500.

The total amount of school construction projects approved for reimbursement by the department under (a)(13) and (a)(14) of this section

may not exceed $177,256,000;

after June 30, 1999, and until October 31, 2006, shall be allocated as follows:

$61,925,000 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of 45,000 or more students in fiscal year 2005, as determined under AS

14.17.500

;

$40,570,000 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of at least 14,600 but less than 20,000 students in fiscal year 2005, as determined under AS

14.17.500

;

$20,000,000 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of at least 10,000 but less than 14,600 students in fiscal year 2005, as determined under AS 14.17.500;

$2,588,000 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of at least 7,500 but less than 10,000 students in fiscal year 2005, as determined under AS 14.17.500;

$5,995,000 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of at least 4,000 but less than 6,000 students in fiscal year 2005, as determined under AS 14.17.500;

$1,237,000 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of at least 2,400 but less than 2,800 students in fiscal year 2005, as determined under AS 14.17.500;

$1,100,000 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of at least 2,200 but less than 2,400 students in fiscal year 2005, as determined under AS 14.17.500;

$7,164,000 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of at least 1,300 but less than 1,500 students in fiscal year 2005, as determined under AS 14.17.500;

$1,260,000 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of at least 740 but less than 757 students in fiscal year 2005, as determined under AS 14.17.500;

$608,000 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of at least 650 but less than 700 students in fiscal year 2005, as determined under AS 14.17.500;

$32,000,000 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of at least 500 but less than 600 students in fiscal year 2005, as determined under AS 14.17.500;

$2,809,000 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of at least 370 but less than 390 students in fiscal year 2005, as determined under AS 14.17.500.

The total amount of school construction projects approved for reimbursement by the department under (a)(15) of this section

may not exceed $14,644,000;

after June 30, 1999, and until October 31, 2006, shall be allocated as follows:

$6,522,000 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of at least 1,925 but less than 2,025 students in fiscal year 2005, as determined under AS

14.17.500

;

$8,122,000 to projects in a municipality with a public school enrollment of at least 398 but less than 400 students in fiscal year 2005, as determined under AS

14.17.500

.

In this section, “outstanding bonds, notes, or other indebtedness” includes bonds issued to refund bonds, notes, or other indebtedness issued to pay costs of school construction or to refund bonds. Refunded bonds, notes, or other indebtedness are not considered outstanding.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner may not approve an application for bond debt reimbursement made by a municipality for school construction or major maintenance for indebtedness authorized by the qualified voters of the municipality on or after January 1, 2015, but before July 1, 2025.

History.

(§ 1 ch 249 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 93 SLA 1971; am § 2 ch 137 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 28 SLA 1973; am § 47 ch 127 SLA 1974; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 120 SLA 1977; am §§ 12, 17 ch 147 SLA 1978; am § 25 ch 168 SLA 1978; am §§ 8 — 10 ch 92 SLA 1982; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 82 SLA 1983; am § 47 ch 6 SLA 1984; am §§ 1 — 5 ch 78 SLA 1985; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 73 SLA 1987; am §§ 7, 8 ch 5 SLA 1990; am §§ 14, 15 ch 78 SLA 1993; am § 9 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 2 ch 30 SLA 1997; am § 2 ch 59 SLA 1997; am §§ 1 — 6 ch 77 SLA 1998; am §§ 2 — 6 ch 130 SLA 2000; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 93 SLA 2001; am §§ 6 — 8 ch 3 SSSLA 2002; am §§ 3, 7 ch 115 SLA 2002; am § 26 ch 35 SLA 2003; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 7 FSSLA 2005; am §§ 3, 4 ch 41 SLA 2006; am § 2 ch 107 SLA 2008; am § 6 ch 93 SLA 2010; am § 21 ch 15 SLA 2014; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 3 SLA 2015; am § 10 ch 3 SLA 2017; am §§ 2, 3 ch 6 SLA 2020)

Delayed repeal. —

Under sec. 6,
ch. 3, SLA 2015, as amended by sec. 5,
ch. 6, SLA 2020, subsection (s) of this section is repealed July 1, 2025.

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

43.18.100

. Renumbered in 1983. Subsection (r) was enacted as a part of subsection (

l

), relettered as (m) in 1987, as (n) in 1996, as (o) in 1998, as (p) in 2000, and as (r) in 2005.
Subsection (m) was formerly (n).
Relettered in 1996, at which time “(m)” was substituted for “(n)” in paragraph (a)(6) and (7).
A contingent amendment to this section made by Sec. 16,
ch. 78, SLA 1993 did not take effect because the constitutional amendment on which it was contingent did not take effect.
Subsection (n) was enacted as (o). Relettered in 1998, at which time former (n) was relettered as (o) [now (r)] and internal references in (a)(8) and (9) were conformed.
Subsection (o) was enacted as (p); relettered in 2000, at which time internal references in (a)(10) were conformed.
Subsections (p) and (q) were enacted as (q) and (r), respectively; relettered in 2005, at which time former (p) was relettered as (r) and internal references in (a)(13) — (15) were conformed.

Administrative Code. —

For planning and construction, see 4 AAC 31, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 23, 2015, in (a)(16) inserted “but before January 1, 2015,”, in (a)(17) substituted “January 1, 2015” for “May 1, 2015”, repealed (a)(18), added (a)(18) and (19), added (s).

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in the first sentence of (e), substituted “including the amount of state aid” for “including but not limited to the amount of state aid” preceding “paid on a per capita”.

The 2020 amendment, effective June 30, 2020, in (a), repealed (a)(18), redesignated (a)(19) and (20) as (a)(18) and (19), and in (a)(18) and (19) and in (s) , substituted “July 1, 2025” for “July 1, 2020”.

Sec. 14.11.102.
Allocation requests.

A request for an allocation of funds under AS

14.11.100

must be submitted to the department by the school district not later than October 15 of the fiscal year before the fiscal year for which the request is made.

The department shall evaluate projects for which retirement of school construction debt is requested. In evaluating projects for bond reimbursement as required under this section, the department shall evaluate all of the following factors, without establishing an absolute priority for any one factor:

emergency requirements;

priorities assigned by the district to the projects requested;

new local elementary and secondary facilities;

existing regional, community, and school facilities, and their condition; this paragraph does not include administrative facilities;

the amount of district operating funds expended for maintenance; and

other program options for accomplishing the project’s objectives.

The commissioner may not allocate funds to a municipality under AS

14.11.100

for the retirement of the principal of and interest on outstanding tax- exempt bonds, notes, or other indebtedness authorized by the qualified voters of the municipality on or after January 1, 2015, but before July 1, 2025.

History.

(§ 6 ch 78 SLA 1985; am § 9 ch 5 SLA 1990; am § 17 ch 78 SLA 1993; am § 5 ch 3 SLA 2015; am § 4 ch 6 SLA 2020)

Delayed repeal. —

Under sec. 6,
ch. 3, SLA 2015, as amended by sec. 5,
ch. 6, SLA 2020,
subsection (c) of this section is repealed July 1, 2025.

Administrative Code. —

For planning and construction, see 4 AAC 31, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 23, 2015, added (c).

The 2020 amendment, effective June 30, 2020, substituted “July 1, 2025” for “July 1, 2020” at the end of (c).

Secs. 14.11.105 — 14.11.120.
Public school facilities construction advance account. [Repealed, § 15 ch 5 SLA 1990.]